Maryland, session 2025, HB0388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–402.
(a) After the conviction of an individual for a violation of Title 2, Subtitle 5, §
2–209, § 3–211, or § 10–110 of the Criminal Law Article, or of the vehicle laws or regulations
of this State or of any local authority, points shall be assessed against the individual as of
the date of violation and as follows:
(47) A VIOLATION OF § 21–902(H) OF THIS ARTICLE……..…..12 POINTS
(48) A VIOLATION OF § 21–902(I) OF THIS ARTICLE…………..12 POINTS
21–902.
(h) (1) A person may not violate subsection (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section if
the person previously has been convicted of two violations of any provision of subsection
(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section or § 8–738 of the Natural Resources Article.
– 1 –

Ch. 568 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) For purposes of this subsection, a conviction for a crime under the laws
of the United States that would be a crime included in paragraph (1) of this subsection if
committed in this State shall be considered a prior conviction under this subsection.
(3) A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and
on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 5 years or a fine not exceeding
$5,000 or both.
(i) (1) A person may not violate subsection (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section if
the person previously has been convicted of:
(i) Three or more violations of any provision of subsection (a), (b),
(c), or (d) of this section or § 8–738 of the Natural Resources Article; or
(ii) A violation of § 2–209, § 2–503, § 2–504, § 2–505, § 2–506, or §
3–211 of the Criminal Law Article.
(2) For purposes of this subsection, a conviction for a crime under the laws
of the United States that would be a crime included in paragraph (1) of this subsection if
committed in this State shall be considered a prior conviction under this subsection.
(3) A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and
on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine not exceeding
$10,000 or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –